Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1310
Annual report; contents.

Within thirty days after each annual anniversary date of an order registering a retirement subdivision or community, the developer or managing agent of such lands shall file a report in the form prescribed by the rules of the agency. The report shall include current audited financial statements, a current public offering statement, any amendments to the statement of record, and information concerning any adjudication of bankruptcy against the developer, the association, the managing agent, or any principal owning more than ten percent of the interest in the retirement subdivision or community, developer, association, or managing agent at the time of filing.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 10;

Laws 2003, LB 61, § 9.